Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-141] False official statements.
Any person subject to this chapter, who, with intent to deceive, signs any
false record, return, rule, order, or other official document, knowing it to be
false, or makes any other false official statement knowing it to be false,
shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next